Hawaii statutes.
[§501-246] Legal incidents of a leasehold
time share interest. A leasehold time share interest, and ownership
therein, shall in all respects be subject to the same burdens and incidents
which attach by law to the lessee's interest in a leasehold apartment that is
part of a condominium property regime established on unregistered land and
which is not utilized in a time share plan.

Nothing in this part shall, in any way, be
construed to relieve a leasehold time share interest or the owners thereof:

(1) From any rights incident to the relation of
husband and wife;

(2) From liability to attachment or mesne process or
levy on execution;

(3) From liability to any lien of any description
established by law on the leasehold time share interest, or in the interest of
the owner in the leasehold time share interest;

(4) To change the laws of descent;

(5) The rights of partition between coparceners and
other cotenants;

(6) The right to take the same by eminent domain;

(7) To relieve such leasehold time share interest
from liability to be recovered by a trustee in bankruptcy under the provisions
of law relating to preferences; or

(8) To change or affect in any way any other rights
or liabilities created by law and applicable to the lessee's interest in a
leasehold apartment which is part of a condominium property regime established
on unregistered land and which is not utilized in a time share plan; except as
otherwise expressly provided in this part. [L 1998, c 219, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next